Massachusetts, session 194th, H2781.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 3 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting after the word “prisoners;” in line 275 the following words:-
employees of the Department of Youth Services holding the position of Assistant Program
Director (administrative officer 3), Program Director (administrative officer 4), or Casework
Manager (administrative officer 4) who have been employed in such capacities for 10 years or
more.
of 1